Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-866
Interstate county bridges; revenue bonds; mortgage security authorized.

The bonds authorized by section 39-860 may, at the option of the governing body of such county, be supported by mortgage or by deed of trust covering such bridge or bridges.

Laws 1935, c. 87, § 7, p. 283;

Laws 1941, c. 78, § 2, p. 317;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2107;

R.S.1943, § 39-866.